Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0797.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9215. (1) A child is exempt from the requirements of this part as to a specific immunization for any period of time as to which a physician certifies that a specific immunization is or may be detrimental to the child's health or is not appropriate. (2) A child is exempt from this part if a parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis of the child presents a written statement to the administrator of the child's school or operator of the group program to the effect that the requirements of this part cannot be met because of religious convictions or other objection to immunization. (3) Notwithstanding section 9227 or any other provision of this act, the department's authority to promulgate rules does not include the authority to promulgate or enforce a rule that imposes a different or additional requirement for a child to be exempt from this part than those described in this section or that requires the exemptions described in this section to be on a form prescribed by the department.